Utah statutes.
54-8a-9.   Association for mutual receipt of notice of excavation
activities.
(1) (a) (i)  Two or more operators may form and operate a statewide
association providing for mutual receipt of notice of excavation activities.
(ii)  If an association is operational, notice to the association shall be
given pursuant to Section 54-8a-4.
(b) (i)  If an association is formed, each operator with an underground
facility in the area shall become a member of the association and participate
in it to:
(A)  receive a notice of a proposed excavation submitted to the association;
(B)  receive the services furnished by it; and
(C)  pay its share of the cost for the service furnished.
(ii)  If an operator does not comply with Subsection (1)(b)(i) and Section
54-8a-5, the operator is liable for damages incurred by an excavator who
complies with this chapter's requirements.
(c)  An association whose members or participants have underground facilities
within a county shall:
(i)  file a description of the geographical area served by the association;
and
(ii)  file the name and address of every member and participating operator
with the county clerk.
(2)  An association receiving notice as provided in Subsection 54-8a-4(1)
shall:
(a)  notify members and participants in the relevant geographic area within 24
hours after receiving notice from the person who proposes to excavate; and
(b)  maintain a record of any notice received for a period of five years to
document compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
